New York, session 2025-2026, S9886.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The highway law is amended by adding a new section 345-e to 2 read as follows: 3 § 345-e. Portion of the state highway system to be dedicated to the 4 Dutchess County Revolutionary War Veterans. All that portion of the 5 state highway system constituting state route eighty-two, beginning at 6 its intersection with Clove Branch Road in the town of East Fishkill, 7 county of Dutchess and continuing to its intersection with Duncan Hill 8 Road in the town of Union Vale, county of Dutchess, shall be dedicated 9 to the Dutchess County Revolutionary War Veterans. 10 § 2. The commissioner of transportation shall provide for the instal- 11 lation and maintenance of adequate signing of the state highway system 12 as dedicated pursuant to section one of this act, provided that such 13 signage shall state "Highway Dedicated to the Dutchess County Revolu- 14 tionary War Veterans". However, to avoid confusion and to limit any 15 possible disruption of commerce, the dedication called for pursuant to 16 section one of this act shall be one of ceremonial nature and the offi- 17 cial name of such highway shall not be changed as a result of this act. 18 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15344-01-6